da: Fjerform: Dun (løse); Fjerbundt/-knippe; Fjerfrynse; Fjerpude/-lap; Fjerbort/boa (trukket); Blandede stykker; Kun fjerpen; Hel/løs fjer; Andet
en: Feather form: Down (loose); Feather bundle/bunch; Feather fringe; Feather pad/patch; Feather trim/boa (strung); Mixed pieces; Quill only; Whole/loose feather; Other
zh-CN: 羽毛形态: 绒羽（散装）; 羽毛束/把; 羽毛流苏; 羽毛垫/贴; 羽毛饰边/羽毛条（串状）; 混合片; 仅羽根; 整羽/散羽; 其他
fi: Höyhenen muoto: Untuva (irtonainen); Sulkakimppu / sulkanippu; Sulkahapsu; Sulkalevy / sulkapaikka; Sulkareunus / boa (punottu); Sekalaiset palat; Pelkkä ruoti; Kokonainen / irtonainen sulka; Muu
lt-LT: Plunksnų forma: Pūkai (palaidi); Plunksnų ryšulys / pundelis; Plunksnų kutai; Plunksnų padelis / lopas; Plunksnų apdaila / boa (suverta); Įvairios dalys; Tik plunksnakočiai; Visa / palaida plunksna; Kita
nb: Fjærform: Dun (løs); Fjærbunt; Fjærfrynser; Fjærpute/-lapp; Fjærkant/boa (på snor); Blandede deler; Kun skaft; Hel/løs fjær; Annet
es: Forma de la pluma: Plumón (suelto); Manojo/ramo de plumas; Fleco de plumas; Almohadilla/parche de plumas; Ribete/boa de plumas (en hilo); Piezas mixtas; Solo cañón; Pluma entera/suelta; Otra
sv: Fjäderform: Dun (löst); Fjäderbunt/-knippe; Fjäderfrans; Fjäderdyna/-lapp; Fjäderband/boa (uppträdd); Blandade bitar; Endast spole; Hel/lös fjäder; Övrigt
zh-TW: 羽毛形態: 絨羽 (散裝); 羽毛捆/束; 羽毛流蘇; 羽毛墊/補丁; 羽毛飾邊/圍巾 (串羽); 綜合碎片; 僅羽管; 完整/散裝羽毛; 其他
nl: Veer vorm: Dons (los); Verenbundel/bos; Verenfranje; Verenpad/patch; Verenrand/boa (geregen); Gemengde stukken; Alleen schacht; Hele/losse veer; Overig
cs: Tvar peří: Prachové (volné); Svazek/trs peří; Péřové třásně; Péřová aplikace/podložka; Péřový lem / boa (navlečené); Různé kusy; Pouze brk; Celé/volné peří; Jiné
de: Federform: Daunen (lose); Federbündel; Federfransen; Feder-Pad/-Patch; Federbesatz/-boa (aufgereiht); Gemischte Stücke; Nur Federkiel; Ganze/lose Feder; Sonstige
hu: Toll alakja: Pehely (laza); Tollcsomag/-köteg; Tollrojt; Tollpárna/-folt; Tolldísz/boa (fűzött); Vegyes darabok; Csak tollszár; Egész/laza toll; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma da pena: Penugem (solta); Pacote/feixe de penas; Franja de penas; Aplique de penas; Guarnição/estola de penas (em fio); Peças mistas; Apenas haste; Pena inteira/solta; Outra
sl-SI: Oblika perja: Puh (prosti); Šop peres; Obroba s peresi; Zaplata s peresi; Obroba s peresi/boa (nanizano); Mešani kosi; Samo steblo; Celo/posamezno pero; Drugo
el: Μορφή φτερού: Πούπουλα (χύμα); Δέσμη/ματσάκι φτερών; Κρόσσι από φτερά; Επίθεμα/μπάλωμα από φτερά; Τρέσα/μπόα φτερών (σε σειρά); Ανάμεικτα κομμάτια; Μόνο ο κεντρικός άξονας; Ολόκληρο/χύμα φτερό; Άλλο
th: รูปทรงขนนก: ขนอ่อน (ไม่มัดรวม); มัด/ช่อขนนก; พู่ขนนก; แผ่นขนนก; ผ้าแต่งขอบ/สายขนนก (ร้อยเชือก); คละชิ้น; ก้านขนนกเท่านั้น; ขนนกเต็มซี่/ชิ้นเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
fr: Forme de la plume: Duvet (en vrac); Lot/botte de plumes; Frange de plumes; Coussinet/pièce de plumes; Garniture de plumes/boa (sur fil); Pièces mixtes; Rachis seul; Plume entière/en vrac; Autre
ru: Форма пера: Пух (россыпью); Пучок перьев; Перьевая бахрома; Перьевая нашивка; Перьевая лента/боа (на нити); Смесь перьев; Только стержни; Цельные перья (россыпью); Другое
bg-BG: Форма на перото: Пух (насипен); Сноп/вързоп пера; Ресни от пера; Подложка/парче от пера; Кант/боа от пера (нанизани); Смесени парчета; Само ствол; Цели/насипни пера; Друго
ja: 羽毛の形状: ダウン (バラ); 羽根の束/バンチ; 羽根のフリンジ; 羽根のパッド/パッチ; 羽根のトリム/ボア (紐通し); ミックスピース; 軸のみ; 丸羽根/バラ羽根; その他
sk-SK: Tvar peria: Páperie (voľné); Zväzok/zväzky pierok; Strapce z pierok; Podložka/nášivka z pierok; Lemovanie z pierok/boa (navlečené); Zmiešané kusy; Len brko; Celé/voľné pierko; Iná
hr-HR: Oblik perja: Paperje (rinfuzno); Snop perja; Resice od perja; Jastučić/zakrpa od perja; Obrub / boa od perja (nanizano); Miješani komadi; Samo badrljica; Cijelo / rinfuzno pero; Ostalo
tr: Tüy şekli: Kuş tüyü (dökme); Tüy demeti/destesi; Tüy saçak; Tüy ped/yama; Tüy şerit/boa (dizili); Karışık parçalar; Sadece telek; Bütün/dökme tüy; Diğer
ko: 깃털 형태: 솜털(낱개); 깃털 번들/단; 깃털 프린지; 깃털 패드/패치; 깃털 트림/보아(엮음); 혼합 피스; 깃대만; 전체/낱개 깃털; 기타
pt-PT: forma de pena: Penugem (solta); Pacote/ramalhete de penas; Franja de penas; Almofada/aplique de penas; Guarnição de penas/boa (enfiado); Peças mistas; Apenas cálamo; Pena inteira/solta; Outro
ro-RO: Formă de pană: Puf (liber); Mănunchi/legătură de pene; Franjuri din pene; Aplică/petic din pene; Bordură de pene/boa (înșirate); Piese mixte; Doar calamus; Pană întreagă/liberă; Altele
it: Forma della piuma: Piuma (sfusa); Fascio/mazzo di piume; Frangia con piume; Cuscinetto/toppa di piume; Decorazione in piume/boa (infilati); Pezzi misti; Solo calamo; Piuma intera/sfusa; Altra
vi: Hình dạng lông vũ: Lông tơ (rời); Bó/cụm lông vũ; Tua rua lông vũ; Tấm/miếng lông vũ; Dải/khăn choàng lông vũ (xâu chuỗi); Mảnh hỗn hợp; Chỉ có ống lông; Lông vũ nguyên vẹn/rời; Khác
pl: Forma piór: Puch (luzem); Pęk piór / wiązka; Frędzle z piór; Podkładka / łatka z piór; Taśma z piórami / boa (nawleczone); Mieszane elementy; Tylko stosina (quill); Całe / luźne pióra; Inna